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DTC P2 102/41
*1

ThrottleActuatorControlMotorCircuit
Low

DTC P2 103/41
*2

ThrottleActuatorControlMotorCircuit
High

*1:ETCStroublecodeNo. is2 1.
*2: ETCS trouble code No. is 24.

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The throttle motor is operated by the engine control ECU and it opens and closes the throttle valve.
The opening angle of the throttle valve is detected by the throttle position sensor which is mounted on the
throttle body. The throttle position sensor provides feedback to the engine control ECU. This feedback allows
the engine control ECU to control the throttle motor and monitor the throttle opening angle as the engine
control ECU responds to driver inputs.
HINT:
This Electrical Throttle Control System (ETCS) does not use a throttle cable.

DTC No. DTC Detection Condition Trouble Area

P2102/41

Conditions (a)and (b)continue for2.0seconds ( 1 tripdetec-
tion logic):
(a) Throttle control motor output duty 80 % or more
(b) Throttle control motor current 0.5 A or less

SOpen in throttlecontrolmotorandsensorcircuit
SThrottlecontrolmotorandsensor
SEnginecontrolECU

P2103/41
Eitherof followingconditions ismet ( 1 tripdetection logic).
(a)Throttlecontrolmotorcurrent 10Aormore (0. 1 sec)
(b)Throttlecontrolmotorcurrent7Aormore (0.6sec.)

SShort in throttlecontrolmotorandsensorcircuit
SThrottlecontrolmotorandsensor
SThrottlevalve
SThrottlebody

SEnginecontrolECU

MONITOR DESCRIPTION
The engine control ECU monitors the current through the electronic throttle motor and detects malfunctions
or open circuit in the throttle motor based on the value of the current. When the current deviates from the
standard, the engine control ECU concludes that there is a fault in the throttle motor.
Or, if the throttle valve is not functioning properly (for example, stuck ON) the engine control ECU concludes
that there is a fault and turns on the MIL and a DTC is set.
Example:
When thecurrent ismore than 10A.Or thecurrent is less than0.5Awhen themotordrivingduty ratio is
exceeding 80%. The engine control ECU concludes that the current is out of range, turns on the MIL and
a DTC is set.
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T23

Component Side:

M+ M−

Throttle Control Motor and Sensor
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FAIL SAFE
If the ETCS (Electronic Throttle Control System) has a malfunction, the engine control ECU cuts off current
to the throttle control motor. The throttle control valve returns to a predetermined opening angle (approxi-
mately 16˚ ) by the force of the return spring. The engine control ECU then adjusts the engine output by con-
trolling the fuel infection (intermittent fuel−cut) and ignition timing in accordance with the accelerator pedal
opening angle to enable the vehicle to continue at a minimum speed.
If the accelerator pedal is depressed firmly and slowly, the vehicle can be driven slowly.
If a ”pass” condition is detected and then the ignition switch is turned OFF, the fail−safe operation will stop
and the system will return to normal condition.

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC P0120 on page DI−63.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Read freeze frame data using the hand−held tester. Freeze frame data records the engine conditions when
a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, freeze frame data can help determine if the vehicle was
running or stopped, if the engine was warmed up or not, if the air−fuel ratio was lean or rich, as well as other
data from the time when a malfunction occurred.

1 Check throttle control motor.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the throttle control motor and sensor connector.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between terminals of the throttle con-
trol motor.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

M+(T23 −2) − M− (T23−1) 0.3 to 100 � (20˚ C(68 ˚ F))

NG Replace throttle body (See Pub. No. RM630E,
pageFI −42).

OK
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T23

M+M−

Wire Harness Side:
Throttle Control Motor and Sensor

A21028

E9

M+

M−

Engine control ECU
Connector
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2 Check for open and short in harness and connector between throttle control mo-
tor and engine control ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the T23 throttle control motor and sensor con-

nector.
(b) Disconnect the E9 engine control ECU connector.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tors.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

M+(T23 −2) − M+(E9 −3) Below 1 �

M− (T23−1) − M− (E9−2) Below 1 �

M+(T23 −2)orM+(E9 −3) −
Body ground

10 k� orhigher

M− (T23−1) or M− (E9−2) −
Body ground

10 k� orhigher

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

3 Visually check throttle valve.

CHECK:
Check between the throttle valve and the housing for foreign objects.
Also, check if the valve can open and close smoothly.

NG Remove foreign object and clean throttle body.

OK

Replace engine control ECU (See Pub. No.
RM630E,pageFI −74).


